Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.136

Collection of overpayments—Issuance of warrant—Lien.

Whenever a notice of determination of liability becomes conclusive and final under RCW 41.50.135, the director, upon giving at least twenty days notice by certified mail return receipt requested to the individual's last known address of the intended action, may file with the superior court clerk of any county within the state a warrant in the amount of the notice of determination of liability plus a filing fee under RCW 36.18.012(10). The clerk of the county where the warrant is filed shall immediately designate a superior court cause number for the warrant, and the clerk shall cause to be entered in the judgment docket under the superior court cause number assigned to the warrant, the name of the person mentioned in the warrant, the amount of the notice of determination of liability, and the date when the warrant was filed. The amount of the warrant as docketed shall become a lien upon the title to, and any interest in, all real and personal property of the person against whom the warrant is issued, the same as a judgment in a civil case duly docketed in the office of such clerk. A copy of the warrant shall be mailed to the person mentioned in the warrant by certified mail to the person's last known address within five days of its filing with the clerk.

[ 2001 c 146 s 5; 1996 c 56 s 2.]